Missouri, session 2026, HB1697.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 275, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 275.380, to read as follows:
275.380. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 275.352 to the contrary,
fees that are collected and remitted to the Missouri Beef Industry Council under
sections 275.300 to 275.370 shall be suspended until the United States Congress enacts a
law making it mandatory for the label of beef cattle or beef food product of cattle to
bear the phrase "Product of the U.S.A." or such similar phrase that displays the
country of origin label for beef or beef food product of cattle that is exclusively born,
raised, and slaughtered in the United States.
2. If legislation enacted by the United States Congress triggers the reinstatement
of the collection and remittance of fees under subsection 1 of this section, and such
legislation is subsequently repealed, the collection of fees under sections 275.300 to
275.370 shall be suspended.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.